src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! ====================================== !
!! # Verbal morphology               
! ====================================== !

!! ## Temporary lexicon

!LEXICON V_
!! @LEXNAME@ temporary lexicon gives +V+WORK
!+V+WORK: # ;

!! ## Closed class verbs
! ------------------

LEXICON VERBNEGATIVE
!! @LEXNAME@ 
! Present Neg
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ог MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2:он MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:оз MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:огӧ MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:онӧ MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:огӧй MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:онӧй MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:оз MatrixVerb_Comparison ;

оз+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:оге MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:онэ MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:огей MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:онэй MatrixVerb_Comparison ;

!Past Neg
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Sg1:эг MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Sg2:эн MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Sg3:эз MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl1:эг MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl2:эн MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl1:эгӧ MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl2:энӧ MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl3:эз MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl1:эге MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl2:энэ MatrixVerb_Comparison ;

!Past Neg Err/Dial
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Use/NG+Err/Dial:иг MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Use/NG+Err/Dial:ин MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:из MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Dial:иг MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/NG+Err/Dial:ин MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/NG+Err/Dial:иге MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/NG+Err/Dial:инэ MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:из MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+Use/NG+Err/Dial+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Err/Dial:иге MatrixVerb_Comparison ;
оз+Use/NG+Err/Dial+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Err/Dial:инэ MatrixVerb_Comparison ;

!Imperative
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:эн K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:эн K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:энӧ K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:энӧй K ;
оз+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:энэ K ;
!A tag is needed to indicate this clitic-like лы segment
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:энлы K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:энлӧй K ;

!Final
моз+V+Neg+Final+1:мог K ; ! мед ог _so that I/we won't_
моз+V+Neg+Final+2:мон K ; ! мед он
моз+V+Neg+Final+3:моз K ; ! мед оз

! Negative copula supletive present forms
!абу+V+Neg+Cop+Ind+Sg:абу K ; ! Aux these are supletive. Past is эз вӧв
!абу+V+Neg+Cop+Ind+Pl:абуӧсь K ; ! Aux these are supletive. Past is эз вӧвны



!! ## Open class verbs
! ----------------

!! Some Flag diacritic lines are with regexes, other with aligned zeros. We want to migrate to
!! regexes < … > , for readability reasons (sic!)

LEXICON IV_ЛОКНЫ
!! @LEXNAME@ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_ЛОКНЫ ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON TV_ЛОКНЫ
!2018-10-21!+TV: V_0_ЛОКНЫ ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON BV_ЛОКНЫ
!2018-10-21!+IV: V_0_ЛОКНЫ ;
!2018-10-21!+TV: V_0_ЛОКНЫ ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON V_ЛОКНЫ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ One verb only, локны:лок
!2018-10-21!+IV:  V_0_ЛОКНЫ ;
LEXICON V_0_ЛОКНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** One verb only, локны:лок
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Inf:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>ны VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Inf+Err/Orth-i-not-y:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>ні VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@+Inf+Px1:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@%>ным VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@+Inf+Px2:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@%>ныд VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@+Inf+Px3:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@%>ныс VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@+Inf+Px2+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@%>нытӧ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@+Inf+Px3+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@%>нысӧ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Inf+Px2+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@%>нытэ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Inf+Px3+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@%>нысэ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+ConNeg+Pl3:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+ConNeg+Pl3+Err/Orth-i-not-y:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ні VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Imprt+Sg2:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>т VerbDer_КУТНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>т VerbDer_V ; !
:т  VerbConj_КУТНЫ ; !а
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@т VerbDer_ONSET_И/І ;


LEXICON VR_ШУНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ Verb_nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer_V ; !
+Refl: VerbConj ; !а
+Refl: VerbConj_V ; !б
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  VerbDer_ONSET_И/І ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@а Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А ;

LEXICON IV_ШУНЫ
!! @LEXNAME@ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_ШУНЫ ;
LEXICON TV_ШУНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_ШУНЫ ;
LEXICON BV_ШУНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_ШУНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_ШУНЫ ;

LEXICON V_ШУНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_ШУНЫ ;
LEXICON V_0_ШУНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb_nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_V ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@  VerbDer_ONSET_И/І ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@а Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А ;
: VerbConj ; !ач
: VerbConj_V ; !б

LEXICON VR_АМНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ Verb_nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer_V ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  VerbDer_ONSET_И/І ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@а Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А ;
+Refl: VerbConj_АМНЫ ; !а
+Refl: VerbConj_V ; !б

LEXICON IV_АМНЫ
!! @LEXNAME@ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_АМНЫ ;
LEXICON TV_АМНЫ
!! @LEXNAME@ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@  V_0_АМНЫ ;
LEXICON BV_АМНЫ

!! @LEXNAME@ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_АМНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@  V_0_АМНЫ ;

LEXICON V_АМНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** амны:ам Ending in -мны, -жны, -дзны,
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_АМНЫ ;
LEXICON V_0_АМНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** амны:ам Ending in -мны, -жны, -дзны,
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb_nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_V ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_ONSET_И/І ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@а Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А ;
: VerbConj_АМНЫ ; !а
: VerbConj_V ; !б

!2018-10-21!LEXICON VR_КЫЙНЫ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
!2018-10-21!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ; !
!2018-10-21!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й Verb_nyDer_ONSET_Ы ; !
!2018-10-21!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й Verb_nyDer_ONSET_Я ; !
!2018-10-21!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й VerbDer_КЫЙНЫ ; !
!2018-10-21!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й VerbDer_V ; !
!2018-10-21!+Refl:й VerbConj_КЫЙНЫ ; !а
!2018-10-21!+Refl:й VerbConj_V ; !б

LEXICON IV_КЫЙНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_КЫЙНЫ ;
LEXICON TV_КЫЙНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_КЫЙНЫ ;
LEXICON BV_КЫЙНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_КЫЙНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_КЫЙНЫ ;
LEXICON V_КЫЙНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** кыйны:кы Ending in -йны, 
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_КЫЙНЫ ;

LEXICON V_0_КЫЙНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** кыйны:кы Ending in -йны, 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й Verb_nyDer_ONSET_Ы ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А/Я ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й VerbDer_КЫЙНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й VerbDer_V ; !
:й VerbConj_КЫЙНЫ ; !а
:й VerbConj_V ; !б

LEXICON VR_КУТНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ Verb_nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer_КУТНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer_V ; !
+Refl: VerbConj_КУТНЫ ; !а
+Refl: VerbConj_V ; !б


LEXICON IV_КУТНЫ_dial
+Err/Dial: IV_КУТНЫ ;
LEXICON IV_КУТНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_КУТНЫ ;
LEXICON TV_КУТНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_КУТНЫ ;
LEXICON BV_КУТНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_КУТНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_КУТНЫ ;
LEXICON V_КУТНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_КУТНЫ ;
LEXICON V_0_КУТНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb_nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_КУТНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_V ; !
: VerbConj_КУТНЫ ; !а
: VerbConj_V ; !б


LEXICON IV_БОСЬТНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_БОСЬТНЫ ;
LEXICON TV_БОСЬТНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_БОСЬТНЫ ;
LEXICON BV_БОСЬТНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_БОСЬТНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_БОСЬТНЫ ;
!LEXICON V_БОСЬТНЫ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
!@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_БОСЬТНЫ ;
LEXICON V_0_БОСЬТНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@т Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@т Verb_nyDer_ONSET_VOW ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@т VerbDer_КУТНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@т VerbDer_V ; !
:т VerbConj_КУТНЫ ; !а
:т VerbConj_V ; !б
!2021-04-07
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ; !no -т
+Use/NG+Err/Dial: VerbDer_V ; !no -т


LEXICON VR_НУАВНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** нуавны:нуа
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@^л2^Close Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@^л2 Verb_nyDer_ONSET_VOW ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@^л2 VerbDer_КУТНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@^л2^Close VerbDer_V ; !
+Refl:^л2 VerbConj_КУТНЫ ; !а
+Refl:^л2^Close VerbConj_V ; !б

LEXICON IV_НУАВНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_НУАВНЫ ;
LEXICON TV_НУАВНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_НУАВНЫ ;
LEXICON BV_НУАВНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_НУАВНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_НУАВНЫ ;
LEXICON V_НУАВНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** нуавны:нуа
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_НУАВНЫ ;
